Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 18 Residential Landlord and Tenant Act
34-18-41.
Waiver of landlord’s right to terminate.

Acceptance of rent with knowledge of a default by the tenant or acceptance of performance by him or her that varies from the terms of the rental agreement constitutes a waiver of the landlord’s right to terminate the rental agreement for that breach, unless the landlord gives written notice within ten (10) days. However, acceptance of partial payment of rent shall not constitute a waiver of the balance due. Acceptance does not waive the landlord’s right to seek remedies for the default.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 95, § 1.

34-18-42.
Landlord liens — Distraint for rent abolished.

A lien or security interest on behalf of the landlord in the tenant’s household goods is not enforceable unless perfected before the effective date of this chapter, except as provided in §

34-18-50

.

Distraint for rent is abolished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-43.
Remedy after termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord has a claim for possession, for a sum for reasonable use and occupation subsequent to the termination, and for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-44.
Self-help recovery of possession prohibited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise, including willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of heat, running water, hot water, electric, gas, or other essential service to the tenant, except in case of abandonment, surrender, or as permitted in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

Particular Cases.

Where a residential tenant had a month-to-month lease, as her landlord prevented her from accessing the premises after October 6, in violation of

R.I. Gen. Laws

§§

34-18-21

and

34-18-44

, she was not obliged to pay rent thereafter and was entitled to the return of her security deposit minus the unpaid, accrued rent for the period from October 1 through October 6. Furlan v. Farrar, 982 A.2d 581,

2009 R.I. LEXIS 120

(R.I. 2009).

It was not an abuse of discretion to find a purchaser of real property tampered with the property’s services to make the property uninhabitable because (1) supporting testimony was found credible, and (2) it could be inferred from that evidence that the purchaser damaged the property on a certain date. Gregoire v. Baird Props., LLC, 138 A.3d 182,

2016 R.I. LEXIS 58

(R.I. 2016).

34-18-45.
Landlord and tenant remedies for abuse of access.

If the tenant refuses to allow lawful access, the landlord may obtain injunctive relief to compel access, or terminate the rental agreement.

If the landlord makes an unlawful entry or a lawful entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful but which have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct or terminate the rental agreement.

In any action under subsection (a) or (b) the prevailing party may recover actual damages and shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-46.
Retaliatory conduct prohibited.

Except as provided in this section, a landlord may not retaliate by increasing rent or decreasing services or by bringing or threatening to bring an action for possession because:

The tenant has complained to a governmental agency charged with responsibility for enforcement of a building or housing code of a violation applicable to the premises materially affecting health and safety; or

The tenant has complained to the landlord of a violation under §

34-18-22

; or

The tenant has organized or become a member of a tenants’ union or similar organization; or

The tenant has availed himself or herself of any other lawful rights and remedies.

If the landlord acts in violation of subsection (a), the tenant is entitled to the remedies provided in §

34-18-34

and has a defense in any retaliatory action against him or her for possession. In an action by or against the tenant, evidence of a complaint within six (6) months before the alleged act of retaliation creates a presumption that the landlord’s conduct was in retaliation. The presumption does not arise if the tenant made the complaint after notice of a proposed rental increase or diminution of services. “Presumption” means that the trier of fact must find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a landlord may bring an action for possession if:

The violation of the applicable building or housing code was caused primarily by lack of reasonable care by the tenant, a member of his or her family, or other person on the premises with his or her consent; or

The tenant is in default in rent; or

Compliance with the applicable building or housing code or other public action such as eminent domain, requires alteration, remodeling, or demolition which would effectively deprive the tenant of use of the dwelling unit, and the relocation requirements have been met by the municipality.

The maintenance of an action under subsection (c) of this section does not release the landlord from liability under §

34-18-28(b)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-47.
Appeals.

Appeals of actions brought under this chapter shall be pursuant to §

9-12-10.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-48.
Execution.

If no appeal is claimed, and if the judgment has not been satisfied, execution shall be issued on the sixth (6th) day following judgment. Executions shall be issued to the division of sheriffs or certified constable. Every execution issued by any district court pursuant to this chapter shall continue in full force and effect for one year after the date thereof and be returnable to the district court that issued it in accordance with the provisions of §

9-25-21

. All costs, including reasonable moving costs, incurred by the division of sheriffs or certified constable in carrying out the mandates of the execution may be added to the execution by the clerk upon approval of the court upon presentment of evidence of the costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 65; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 34; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 34.

34-18-49.
Payment of rent on stay of execution.

Whenever, in any action for the recovery of real property, the issuance of an execution, or the service of an execution, is stayed by order of the court or by the operation of law, the stay shall be conditioned upon the payment by tenant to the landlord of sums of money equal to the rent for the premises, which sums shall be paid at such times and in such amounts as rent would be due and payable were the action not then pending. The acceptance of these sums shall not constitute a waiver of the right of the landlord to obtain possession of the premises, nor shall the receipt thereof be deemed to reinstate the tenancy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-50.
Payment of moving costs required.

Whenever the personal property of any tenant is removed from the premises the tenant occupies by mandate of an execution from the court of competent jurisdiction, the tenant shall pay the entire amount of the cost of moving the personal property and any prepaid storage charges to the division of sheriffs, constable, or other person who lawfully caused the personal property to be so moved before the personal property can be released to the tenant by the person, firm, partnership, company, association, or corporation having lawful possession of the property. Further, the division of sheriffs, constable, or other person who lawfully caused the personal property to be so moved shall prepare and deliver a release in writing stating that the costs of moving and any prepaid storage charges have been paid in full and authorizing the release of the personal property to the tenant. This amount shall be paid to the landlord as reimbursement for the costs of removing the personal property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 65.

34-18-51.
Issuance of execution on nonpayment of rent.

In the event that the tenant shall fail or refuse to pay all sums promptly when due in accordance with the provisions of §

34-18-49

, the court in which the judgment for possession was issued shall, on motion of the landlord and after hearing thereon, including satisfactory proof of such nonpayment, enter an order for the issuance of such execution and the prompt service thereof, and from this order there shall be no appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-52.
Payment of rent during pendency of appeal.

Whenever an action for the recovery of real property is pending on appeal in the superior or supreme court, the tenant in the action shall pay to the landlord sums of money equal to the rent for the premises, which the sums shall be paid at such times and in such amounts as rent would be due and payable were the action not then pending. The acceptance of these sums shall not constitute a waiver of the right of the landlord to obtain possession of the premises, nor shall their receipt be deemed to reinstate the tenancy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-53.
Dismissal of appeal for nonpayment of rent during pendency of appeals.

In the event that the tenant fails or refuses to pay all sums promptly when due, in accordance with the provisions of §

34-18-52

, the court in which the case is pending, shall, without any trial on the merits, on motion of the landlord, and after hearing thereon, including satisfactory proof of such nonpayment, enter an order for the entry of judgment and the issuance of the execution and the prompt service thereof, and from that order there shall be no appeal. The papers shall be forthwith returned to the district court which shall upon payment of the required fee, issue an execution without further delay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 75, § 1.

34-18-54.
Savings clause.

Transactions entered into before January 1, 1987, and not extended or renewed on and after that date, and the rights, duties and interests flowing from them remain valid and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this chapter as though the repeal or amendment had not occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-55.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or application of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2.

34-18-56.
Notices and complaint forms.

A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving a tenant a five (5) day demand for payment of rent prior to commencement of an eviction pursuant to §

34-18-35

:

A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving a tenant a notice of noncompliance with the rental agreement pursuant to §

34-18-36

:

A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving a tenant notice of termination of tenancy pursuant to §

34-18-37

:

A complaint in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of commencing an eviction action for nonpayment of rent pursuant to §

34-18-35

:

A complaint in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of commencing an eviction action for noncompliance with the rental agreement pursuant to §

34-18-36

, or an eviction action for unlawfully holding over after expiration or termination of the tenancy pursuant to §

34-18-38

:

A complaint in substantially the following language, or in similar language, shall be sufficient for use by landlords or by tenants to bring any claims or causes of action other than eviction actions:

The summons in an action for eviction for nonpayment of rent pursuant to §

34-18-35

shall be in substantially the following form:

The summons in an action for eviction for noncompliance with the rental agreement pursuant to §

34-18-36

, or for unlawfully holding over after termination or expiration of tenancy pursuant to §

34-18-38

, shall be in substantially the following form:

The summons in an action relating to any claims by tenants, or by landlords other than for eviction, shall be in substantially the following form:

(j)

The blank answer served in eviction actions shall be in substantially the following form:

FIVE-DAY DEMAND NOTICE FOR NONPAYMENT OF RENTDate of Mailing: R.I.G.L.

34-18-35

TO: (tenant) You are now more than fifteen days in arrears for some or all of the rent owed under your rental agreement. State law requires that you be sent this Notice of arrearage. Unless you make payment of all rent in arrears within five days of the date this notice was mailed to you, an eviction action may be instituted in court against you. You can prevent the eviction by paying all rent owing within five days of the mailing of this notice. If you believe you have a legal reason for not paying this rent, you will be able to present that defense at the eviction hearing. The rent in arrears as of the above date is $. (signature) (name and address of land- lord/owner) I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice, addressed to the tenant, on the day of , 20. (landlord or owner signature)

Click to view

NOTICE OF NONCOMPLIANCEDate of Mailing: R.I.G.L.

34-18-36

TO: (tenant) (address) You are in breach of your rental agreement, or of your legal duties under , because you: R.I.G.L. 34-18-24 (provide details) To remedy this situation you must do the following within twenty days of the date of mailing of this Notice: If you do not remedy this situation within twenty days, your rental agreement will terminate without further notice on (date, which must be not less than twenty-one days from the date of mailing of this Notice). (NOTE: Under the law you lose this right to remedy your noncompliance if this is the second notice on the same subject within the past six months.) After that date an eviction case may begin in court, and you may be served with a complaint. You will have the right to a hearing and to present any defenses you believe you have. (signature) (name and address of land- lord/owner) I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice, addressed to the tenant, on the day of , 20. (landlord or owner signature)

Click to view

NOTICE OF TERMINATION OF TENANCYDate of Mailing: R.I.G.L.

34-18-37

TO: (tenant) (address) You are hereby directed to vacate and remove your property and personal possessions from the premises located at (address of premises) and deliver control of the premises to the landlord/owner on the first day after the end of your current rental period, namely . (insert date) This notice is given for the purpose of terminating your tenancy. You must continue to pay rent as it becomes due until the date indicated above. If you fail to pay that rent, a nonpayment eviction action may be instituted against you. If you fail to vacate the premises by the date specified, an eviction may be instituted against you without further notice. If you believe you have a defense to this termination, you will be able to raise that defense at the court hearing. (signature) (name and address of land- lord/owner) I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice, addressed to the tenant, on the day of , 20. (landlord or owner signature)

Click to view

State of Rhode Island , Sc. DISTRICT COURT DIVISION PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT (Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name) V (address) (address of rental premises) COMPLAINT FOR EVICTIONFOR NONPAYMENT OF RENT R.I.G.L.

34-18-35

1. Plaintiff is the owner/landlord of the rental premises listed above, in which the Defendant Tenant currently resides. 2. Defendant is more than fifteen days in arrears in rental payments due to the plaintiff from the defendant. The rent is $ per , and the amount in arrears is $ as of the day of , 20. (month) 3. Plaintiff has served the five-day demand notice as required by law, and a copy of that notice is attached to this complaint. The notice was mailed to the defendant on the day of , 20. 4. Defendant has not paid the rent in arrears or offered the full amount in arrears, either before or after the demand notice. Defendant remains in possession of the rental premises. WHEREFORE, Plaintiff requests that this Court grant a judgment for possession of the premises (eviction of the tenant) and for back rent in the amount of $, plus costs. (Name & address of landlord/owner or attorney for landlord) Date complaint filed with clerk

Click to view

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND , Sc. DISTRICT COURT DIVISION PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT (Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name) V (address) (address of rental premises) COMPLAINT FOR EVICTIONFOR REASON OTHER THANNONPAYMENT OF RENT R.I.G.L.

34-18-36

R.I.G.L.

34-18-38

1. Plaintiff Landlord(s) owns the rental premises listed above, in which the Defendant Tenant(s) resides. 2. CHECK ONE:
Defendant breached the tenant’s obligations under the rental agreement or as set forth in the attached copy of the notice of noncompliance which was mailed to the defendant. Defendant has not cured or remedied the breach. (Plaintiff must attach copy of required notice of noncompliance.) §

34-18-24

Defendant has remained in possession of the rented premises following the period set forth in the attached notice of termination of tenancy which was mailed to defendant. (Plaintiff must attach copy of required termination notice.)
Defendant breached the tenants’ obligations under , (9) or (10). §

34-18-24(8)

3. Plaintiff seeks judgment for possession of the premises plus judgment in the amount of for (explain basis for money claim) Plaintiff seeks costs and fees (if applicable). (Signature of Landlord/Owner or Attorney) Date complaint filed with clerk

Click to view

NOT FOR EVICTION State of Rhode Island , Sc. DISTRICT COURT DIVISION PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT (Name) (Name) V (address) (address of rental premises) LANDLORD-TENANT COMPLAINT (NOT FOR USE IN EVICTIONS) 1. Plaintiff is the Tenant Landlord/Owner of the rental premises at . (address of rental premises) 2. Defendant is the Tenant Landlord/Owner. 3. Plaintiff claims that defendant has breached the obligations of the rental agreement or law in relation to this landlord-tenant relationship, as follows: (brief description of claim, attach extra sheet, if necessary) 4. Plaintiff seeks the following judgment or relief from the Court: Date Complaint Filed With Clerk: (Signature of plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney) (address)

Click to view

STATE OF RHODE ISLANDDISTRICT COURTSUMMONSEVICTION-NONPAYMENT OF RENTDIVISION COUNTY CIVIL ACTION-FILE NO. Address of Court: (name & address of plaintiff (name & address of defendant- landlord) tenant) TO THE TENANT: You are served with an eviction complaint for nonpayment of rent. If you do nothing, you will lose by default and be evicted. If you claim any defense, you must complete the enclosed ANSWER and file it with the Court Clerk at or before the hearing date. You should also mail a copy to the landlord or the landlord’s lawyer. Your hearing will be at 9:30 A.M. on the hearing date, at the court address listed above. You should go to the hearing or you may lose by default. If you think the case is “settled,” you should still go to the hearing to make sure the settlement is in the court record. YOUR HEARING DATE IS: . (Proof of Service on next page) PROOF OF SERVICE I hereby certify that I served a copy of the Complaint and Summons & Answer upon the defendant(s) by delivering or leaving said papers in the following manner: to the defendant personally; or at his or her dwelling unit or usual place of abode at the address listed below with a person of suitable age then residing therein; or if none be found, by posting conspicuously on the door to the defendant’s dwelling unit. ADDRESS OF DWELLING OR USUAL PLACE OF ABODE: NAME OF PERSON OF SUITABLE AGE: SERVICE DATE: DEPUTY SHERIFF/CONSTABLE: CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE I hereby certify that a copy of this Complaint and Summons was placed into regular U.S. Mail, postage prepaid, on the day of , 20, addressed to defendant at the following address: . (Signature of Clerk)

Click to view

State of Rhode Island District CourtSummons EVICTION FOR REASON OTHER THAN NONPAYMENT OF RENT DIVISIONCOUNTYCIVIL ACTION-FILE NO. Address of Court: V (name & address of plaintiff (name & address of landlord) defendant-tenant) TO THE TENANT: You are served with an eviction complaint for noncompliance with rental agreement (), or for unlawfully holding over after termination or expiration of tenancy (). If you do nothing, you will lose by default and be evicted. If you claim any defense, you must complete the enclosed ANSWER and file it with the Court Clerk within TWENTY (20) days after you are served with this summons and complaint. You should also mail a copy of the ANSWER to the landlord or the landlord’s lawyer. If you file the enclosed ANSWER, then you will receive another written notice telling you when the hearing will be. If you have any questions, you may consult a lawyer. If you think the case is “settled” you should still file the enclosed ANSWER or be sure that the written settlement is in the file at the Clerk’s office. R.I.G.L.

34-18-36

R.I.G.L. 34-18-38 (Proof of Service on next page) PROOF OF SERVICE I hereby certify that I served a copy of the Complaint, Summons, and Answer form upon the defendant(s) by delivering or leaving said papers in the following manner: to the defendant personally at his/her dwelling unit or usual place of abode at the address listed below, with a person of suitable age then residing therein to an agent named below authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process further notice as required by law was given as noted below Address of dwelling or usual place of abode: Name of person of suitable age or of agent: Service Date: Deputy Sheriff/Constable (circle one): (signature)

Click to view

State of Rhode Island District CourtSummons DIVISION COUNTY CIVIL ACTION-FILE NO. PLAINTIFF PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY ADDRESS vs DEFENDANT DEFENDANT’S ADDRESS TO THE ABOVE-NAMED DEFENDANT: You are hereby summoned and required to serve upon the plaintiff’s attorney, whose name and address appears above, an answer to the complaint which is herewith served upon you. Your answer must be made within 20 days after service of this summons, excluding the date of service. The original must be filed in writing with this court. If you fail to do so, judgment by default will be taken against you for the relief demanded in the complaint. DATE CLERK SEAL OF THE DISTRICT COURT DATE RECEIVED PROOF OF SERVICE I hereby certify that on the date below I served a copy of this summons and a copy of the complaint received herewith upon the above-named defendant by delivering or leaving said papers in the following manner: • to the defendant personally. • at his or her dwelling house or usual place of abode at the address entered below, with a person of suitable age and discretion then residing therewith. • to an agent named below authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process. • Further notice as required by statute was given as noted on the reverse side. Address of Dwelling or Usual Place of Abode Name of Authorized Agent or Person of Suitable Age Date Deputy Sheriff/Constable SERVICE FEE $

Click to view

State of Rhode Island , Sc. DISTRICT COURT DIVISION PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT (Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name) V (address) (address of rental premises) INSTRUCTIONS TO THE DEFENDANT Listed below are several possible defenses to the eviction action your landlord has filed against you. If one or more of these defenses apply to your case, check the appropriate box(es). If space is provided, write in facts in support of that defense. Use additional paper if necessary. Some of these defenses are technical, and there may be others not listed here. You may consult a lawyer and seek representation before filling out this Answer. TENANT’S ANSWER The complaint against me is untrue or fails to state the following facts: I offered rent, but my landlord refused it. I am still able and willing to pay the rent. I have a defense for nonpayment because the landlord has failed to maintain the premises in a fit and habitable condition My rent has not been paid, but I have a legally justifiable defense for not paying: I have a written lease which does not expire until: I have not received the required notice from the landlord before this complaint was served on me. The landlord is trying to evict me because I have exercised my legal rights by calling code enforcement officials, or by taking the following protected action: I have other defenses as follow: WHEREFORE: Because of the defense(s) indicated above, I ask the court to grant a judgment in my favor and not order me to be evicted. COUNTERCLAIM Instructions: If you believe you are entitled to be awarded damages or money for any reason from your landlord, you may fill out the statement below: I hereby sue my landlord for the amount of $. I believe I am entitled to receive an award of this amount because Name of Defendant (or attorney)Signature of Defendant Address Telephone number

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 649, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 229, § 1.

34-18-57.
Providence and Warwick Absentee Landlord Enforcement Act.

All persons, corporations, organizations, associations or other legal entities owning and leasing property in the cities of Providence or Warwick shall register their names, home addresses, including zip codes, and telephone numbers with the city clerk in the city where such property is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 465, § 1.